Washington statutes.
RCW 15.140.090

Internet-based application.

Washington State University may, within existing resources, develop and make accessible an internet-based application designed to assist hemp producers by providing regional communications concerning recommended planting times for hemp crops in this state.

[ 2019 c 158 s 9.]